Arkansas, session 2025, SB387.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 17-4-110 is amended to read as follows:
17-4-110. Responsibilities of occupational licensing entities.
An occupational licensing entity shall:
(1) Submit proposed rules authorized under § 17-4-106 to the
Administrative Rules Subcommittee of the Legislative Council for review and
approval before the proposed rules are promulgated under the Arkansas
Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et seq.;
(2) If the proposed rules are not approved as required under §
17-4-109, provide automatic occupational licensure to an individual listed in
§ 17-4-104; and
(3) Post prominently on the occupational licensing entity's
*JLL176*
03/05/2025 9:58:05 AM JLL176

SB387
website a link entitled “Military Member Licensure” that directly leads to
information applicable to an individual listed in § 17-4-104; and
(4) Provide to the House Committee on Aging, Children and Youth,
Legislative and Military Affairs an annual report stating the number of
individuals granted automatic occupational licensure and expedited
occupational licensure under this chapter.






























03/05/2025 9:58:05 AM JLL176